Illinois, session 104th, SB3852.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 6is amended by adding Section 605-1119 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 605/605-1119 new)8    Sec. 605-1119. Child Care Solutions Pilot Program.9    (a) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall 10establish a Child Care Solutions Pilot Program to make grants 11to child care centers in pilot communities. The Department 12shall designate up to 10 municipalities in the State to be 13pilot communities. Municipalities may apply to the Department 14for consideration for designation as a pilot community no 15later than January 1, 2027. In approving applications for 16designation as a pilot community, the Department shall 17consider the economic need of the community and shall strive 18to designate pilot communities in all geographic regions of 19the State. 20    (b) The Illinois Child Care Solutions Fund is hereby 21created as a special fund in the State treasury. The 22Department shall administer the Child Care Solutions Pilot 23Program using moneys appropriated from the Fund. The Fund   SB3852- 2 -LRB104 17147 HLH 30566 b1shall receive private donations, and the State shall provide 2$2 in matching funds from the General Revenue Fund for each $1 3in private donations received by the Fund, provided that the 4total amount of matching funds may not exceed $3,000,000 in 5any State fiscal year. 6    (c) The Department shall adopt rules to administer this 7Section.  8    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 9Section 5.1038 as follows: 10    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)11    Sec. 5.1038. The Illinois Child Care Solutions Fund. 12    Section 15. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 13adding Section 246 as follows: 14    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)15    Sec. 246. Donations to the Illinois Child Care Solutions 16Fund.17    (a) Each taxpayer who makes a donation to the Illinois 18Child Care Solutions Fund during the taxable year is entitled 19to a credit against the taxes imposed by subsections (a) and 20(b) of Section 201 in an amount equal to 75% of those donated 21amounts. 22    (b) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce   SB3852- 3 -LRB104 17147 HLH 30566 b1the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 2the credit exceeds the income tax liability for the applicable 3tax year, the excess may be carried forward and applied to the 4tax liability of the 5 taxable years following the excess 5credit year. The credit shall be applied to the earliest year 6for which there is a tax liability. If there are credits from 7more than one year that are available to offset a liability, 8the earlier credit shall be applied first. 9    (c) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 10250.  11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.